Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF20.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1285YH (2) 91 ll/js H.F. 20 Section 1. Section 331.441, subsection 2, paragraph c, Code 1 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (11) Acquisition of vehicles or vehicle 3 equipment for a county sheriff, county attorney, county jail 4 facility, county maintenance department, county conservation 5 department, or county public health department. 6